Hawaii statutes.
§560:2-110 Debts to decedent. A debt
owed to a decedent is not charged against the intestate share of any individual
except the debtor. If the debtor fails to survive the decedent, the debt is
not taken into account in computing the intestate share of the debtor's
descendants. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next